District of Columbia statutes.
26-501

Conversion of District credit unions into federal credit unions — Procedure.

Any credit union organized under the District of Columbia Credit Unions Act (47 Stat. 326) [P.L. 72-190], as amended, may apply for conversion into a federal credit union by filing with the Administrator of the National Credit Union Administration (hereinafter referred to as the Administrator), pursuant to a resolution adopted by a majority of its directors, an organization certificate meeting the requirements of § 4 of the Federal Credit Union Act (§ 1753 of Title 12, United States Code ), as amended.

Aug. 1, 1964, 78 Stat. 377, Pub. L. 88-395, § 1
The “Director of the Bureau of Federal Credit Unions” formerly referred to in this section, was changed to “Administrator of the National Credit Union Administration” by §§ 1 to 3 of the Act of March 10, 1970, 84 Stat. 49.
1973 Ed., § 26-519.
1981 Ed., § 26-601.
This section is referenced in § 26-710 and § 28-4601.